Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2227.01
Area agencies on aging; appropriations; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate two million dollars in fiscal year 2025-26 and two million dollars in fiscal year 2026-27 from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund to the area agencies on aging for the purpose of providing additional eligible activities and services as defined in section 81-2222. An equal amount shall be distributed to each of the state's eight area agencies on aging.

Laws 2025, LB382, § 2.